Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,288
Mobile home parks; minimum requirements; local government; adopt; licenses; issuance.

(1) A local government may by resolution, ordinance, or regulation adopt minimum requirements for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of mobile home parks.

(2) A local government may issue licenses for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of mobile home parks which are found to comply with the Uniform Standard Code for Mobile Home Parks and such minimum requirements established by such local government.

Laws 1976, LB 91, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 137;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4631;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 35.
July 18, 2026